src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinenyishinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinenyishinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinenyishinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinenyishinaanidigag
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinensishinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinensishinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinensishinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinensishinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinensishinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinensishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyishinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyishinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyishinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyishinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyishinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyishiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyishiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyishiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyishiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyishiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyishiwaadigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensishinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensishinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensishinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensishinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensishinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensishiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensishiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensishiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensishiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensishiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensishiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinenyishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyishiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyishiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinenyishiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyishiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyishiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyishiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyishiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyishiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinensishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinensishiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinensishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensishiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinensishiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinensishiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinensishiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensishiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensishiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensishiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinimishinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinimishinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinimishinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinimishinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinimishinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinimishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinimishinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinimishinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinimishinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinimishinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinimishinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinimishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinimishiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinimishiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinimishiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinimishiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinimishiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinimishiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinimishiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinimishiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinimishiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinimishiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinimishiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinimishiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinimishiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinimishiwaadigag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinenyimishinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinenyimishinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinenyimishinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinenyimishinaanidigag
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinensimishinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinensimishinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinensimishinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinensimishinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinensimishinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinensimishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyimishinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyimishinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyimishinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyimishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyimishiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyimishiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyimishiwaadigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensimishinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensimishinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensimishinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensimishinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensimishinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensimishinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensimishiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensimishiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensimishiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensimishiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensimishiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensimishiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinenyimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyimishiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyimishiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyimishiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyimishiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyimishiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinensimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinensimishiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinensimishiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensimishiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensimishiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinensimishiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinensimishiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinensimishiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensimishiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensimishiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensimishiwaadigag
     
